Wisconsin, session 2025, AB857.
do enact as follows:AB857,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB857,26Section 2. 20.235 (1) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:AB857,2,9720.235 (1) (dm) Climate change scholarship program. Biennially, the 8amounts in the schedule for the climate change scholarship program under s. 939.467.AB857,310Section 3. 39.467 of the statutes is created to read:AB857,2,151139.467 Climate change scholarship program. (1) In this section, 12“institution of higher education” means an institution or college campus within the 13University of Wisconsin System, a technical college within the technical college 14system, a tribally controlled college, or a private, nonprofit institution of higher 15education located in this state.AB857,2,2116(2) The board shall create and administer a program awarding scholarships 17to resident students who are enrolled in an institution of higher education and who 18are engaged in studies directly related to programs preparing the students for 19careers in occupational areas addressing or responding to climate change. A 20student may not receive more than $5,000 in scholarships under this program per 21academic year.AB857,3,222(3) In each academic year, the board shall ensure that of the scholarships 1awarded from the program under sub. (2), one-half are awarded on the basis of 2merit and one-half are awarded on the basis of financial need.AB857,3,73(4) The board may not award a scholarship from the program under sub. (2) to 4a student whose name appears on the statewide support lien docket under s. 49.854 5(2) (b), unless the student provides to the board a payment agreement that has been 6approved by the county child support agency under s. 59.53 (5) and that is 7consistent with rules promulgated under s. 49.858 (2) (a).AB857,3,98(5) Costs associated with the program established under sub. (2) shall be 9funded from the appropriation under s. 20.235 (1) (dm).AB857,3,1010